Washington statutes.
RCW 35.54.100

Deferral of collection of assessments for economically disadvantaged persons—Payment from guaranty fund—Lien—Payment dates for deferred obligations.

Whenever payment of a local improvement district assessment is deferred pursuant to the provisions of RCW 35.43.250 the amount of the deferred assessment shall be paid out of the local improvement guaranty fund. The local improvement guaranty fund shall have a lien on the benefited property in an amount equal to the deferral together with interest as provided for by the establishing ordinance.

The lien may accumulate up to an amount not to exceed the sum of two installments: PROVIDED, That the ordinance creating the local improvement district may provide for one or additional deferrals of up to two installments. Local improvement assessment obligations deferred under chapter 137, Laws of 1972 ex. sess. shall become payable upon the earliest of the following dates:

(1) Upon the date and pursuant to conditions established by the political subdivision granting the deferral; or

(2) Upon the sale of property which has a deferred assessment lien upon it from the purchase price; or

(3) Upon the death of the person to whom the deferral was granted from the value of his or her estate; except a surviving spouse shall be allowed to continue the deferral which shall then be payable by that spouse as provided in this section.

[ 2009 c 549 s 2092; 1972 ex.s. c 137 s 3.]

NOTES:

Severability—1972 ex.s. c 137: See note following RCW 35.49.010.